Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,129
Nonspecialized attire furnished by students; authorized.

A governing body may require students to furnish and wear nonspecialized attire meeting general written guidelines for specified courses and activities if the written guidelines are reasonably related to the course or activity.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 5.